California statutes. Labor Code
(a) Nongassy, which classification shall be applied to tunnels or underground mines where there is little likelihood of encountering gas during the construction of the tunnel or operation of an underground mine. Such tunnels shall be constructed or underground mines operated under regulations, rules, and orders developed by the division and board and approved by the board. This subdivision shall not prohibit the division chief or his representatives from establishing any special orders that they feel are necessary for safety.

(b) Potentially gassy, which classification shall be applied to tunnels or underground mines where there exists a possibility gas will be encountered.

(c) Gassy, which classification shall be applied to tunnels or underground mines where it is likely gas will be encountered. Special safety measures, including those set forth in Sections 7965 to 7976, inclusive, those established by the division and board and adopted by the board, or special orders written by the chief or his representatives shall be observed in construction of gassy tunnels in addition to regular rules, orders, special orders, or regulations.

(d) Extrahazardous, which classification may, when the division finds that there is a serious danger to the safety of the employees, be applied to tunnels or underground mines where gas or vapors have caused an explosion or fire, where the likelihood of encountering petroleum vapors exists, or where tests show, with normal ventilation, a concentration of hydrocarbon petroleum vapors in excess of 20 percent of the lower explosive limit within three inches of the roof, face, floor, or walls of any open workings. Construction in extrahazardous tunnels or operation in extrahazardous underground mines shall conform to safety measures set forth in Sections 7977 to 7985, inclusive, any rules, regulations, orders, or special orders of the division, or any special rules, orders, or regulations adopted by the board.

The division shall not be required to reclassify any tunnel or underground mine that is shut down seasonally, when such tunnel or underground mine is put back into operation in not less than six months after date of the shutdown.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7956.

All personnel, including both employees working above ground and those in the tunnel or underground mine, shall be informed of the classification designated by the division for that job. A notice of the classification and any special orders, rules, or regulations to be used in construction, remodeling, demolition, or operation of the tunnel or underground mine shall be prominently posted at the site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7957.

An emergency rescue plan shall be developed by the employer for every tunnel or underground mine. Such plan, including a current map of the tunnel or underground mine, shall be provided to local fire and rescue units, to the division, and to every employee at the place of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7958.

A trained rescue crew of at least five men shall be provided at underground mines with more than 25 men or tunnels with 10 or more men underground at any one time. Smaller mines shall have one man for each 10 men underground who receives annual training in the use of breathing apparatus. Two trained crews shall be provided at mines with more than 50 men underground and at tunnels with more than 25 men underground.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7959.

Rescue crews shall be familiar with all emergency equipment necessary to effect a rescue or search for missing employees in case of an accident or explosion. Such rescue crews shall hold practices with equipment and using emergency rescue plan procedures at least once monthly during construction or operation of the tunnel or underground mines. At least one rescue crew shall be maintained above ground at all times and within 30 minutes travel of the tunnel or underground mine site classified as gassy or extrahazardous.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7960.

In any tunnel or underground mine classified as potentially gassy, tests for gas or vapors shall be made prior to start of work at each shift. If any concentration of gas at or above 10 percent of the lower explosive limit is recorded, the division shall be notified immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7961.

The division shall investigate immediately any notification of a gas reading 10 percent of the lower explosive limit or higher by an employer in a tunnel or underground mine classified as potentially gassy. If the inspection determines the likelihood of encountering more gas or vapor, the division may halt operations until the tunnel or mine can be reclassified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7962.

A safety representative qualified to recognize hazardous conditions and certified by the division shall be designated by the employer in any tunnel or underground mine. He shall have the authority to correct unsafe conditions and unsafe practices, and shall be responsible for directing the required safety programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7963.

All underground mines and tunnels with more than five men underground at one time shall have telephone or other communication systems to the surface in operation at any time there are persons underground. Such systems shall be installed in such a manner that destruction or removal of one phone or communication device does not make other phones or communication devices inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7964.

Whenever an access shaft is used as the normal means of entrance or exit to an underground mine or tunnel, it shall be constructed of fireproof material or fireproofed by chemical or other means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7964.5.

Nothing contained in this part shall restrict the division in contracting with the Secretary of the Interior for an approved state plan for mines under P.L. 89-577 (30 U.S.C. 721 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Gassy and Extrahazardous Tunnels [7965. - 7985.]

7965.

Any tunnel or underground mine classified by the division as gassy shall operate under special procedures adopted by the board, as well as rules, regulations, special orders, or general orders for nongassy underground mines and tunnels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7966.

In any tunnel classified as gassy by the division, there shall be tests for gas or vapors taken prior to each shift and at least hourly during actual operation. If a mechanical excavator is used, gas tests shall be made prior to removal of muck or material and before any cutting or drilling in tunnels or underground mines where explosives are used. A log shall be maintained for inspection by the division showing results of each test. Whenever a tunnel excavation or underground mine operation approaches a geologic formation in which there is a likelihood of encountering gas or water, a probe hole at least 20 feet ahead of the tunnel face or area where material is being mined shall be maintained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7967.

Whenever gas levels in excess of 10 percent of the lower explosive limit are encountered initially in a tunnel or underground mine classified as gassy, the division shall be notified immediately by telephone or telegraph. The chief of the division or his authorized representative may waive subsequent notification for gas readings less than 20 percent of the lower explosive limits upon a finding that adequate ventilation and other safety measures are provided to assure employee safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7968.

In any gassy tunnel or underground mine, the division may order work halted until adequate testing can be completed to determine the level of hazard from gases or vapors. A notice of such shutdown shall be filed by the division inspector with his superiors as soon as practicable. Any overruling of such order must be made by the chief or his designated representative and must be in writing. An onsite inspection must be made by the person overruling an inspector’s order prior to resumption of work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7969.

In any gassy tunnel or underground mine the division shall review plans for electrical lighting and power for equipment. When it is necessary for safety, the inspector may require changes in the amount and type of lighting, and may require permissive-type wiring, switches, tools, and equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7970.

In any tunnel or underground mine classified gassy, smoking shall be prohibited and the employer shall be responsible for collecting all personal sources of ignition such as lighters and matches from employees entering the tunnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7971.

Whenever there is any ignition of gas or vapor in a tunnel or underground mine, all work shall cease, employees shall be removed, and reentry except for rescue purposes shall be prohibited until the division has conducted an inspection and authorized reentry for maintenance or production in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7972.

If the level of gas in any tunnel or underground mine reaches 20 percent of its lower explosive limit at any time all men shall be removed, the division notified immediately by telephone or telegram, and no one shall reenter the tunnel or underground mine until approval is given by the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7973.

In any tunnel or underground mine classified as gassy, all employees shall be informed of any special orders made by the division following an inspection. Such notice shall be given before entering the tunnel or underground mine. A copy of any orders subsequently written by the division shall be posted and all employees shall be notified at a safety meeting called by the safety representative before they are permitted to start work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7974.

In any tunnel classified as gassy by the division, ventilation shall include continuous exhausting of fumes and air, unless an alternative ventilation plan which is as effective or better is approved by the division. Fans for this purpose shall be located at the surface, and shall be reversible from a single switch at the portal or shaft. These requirements shall not preclude the use of auxiliary fans to supply more air or greater exhaust to a tunnel or underground mine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7975.

A “kill” button capable of cutting off all electrical equipment shall be maintained in any gassy tunnel or underground mine. The safety representative or his designated representative shall cut off power at any time gas or vapor levels reach 20 percent of the lower explosive limit or more. Before work is restarted every employee underground shall be informed of the level of gas or vapor recorded, and a permanent record shall be called to the surface and retained in a special log.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7976.

In any tunnel or underground mine classified as gassy, the division shall determine the number of fire extinguishers necessary and their locations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7977.

Any tunnel or underground mine classified as extrahazardous by the division shall comply with the provisions for gassy tunnels in this chapter, as well as regulations, rules, special orders, and general orders of the division or board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7978.

In any extrahazardous tunnel or underground mine smoking by employees or open flame shall be prohibited. Welding or cutting with arc or flame underground in other than fresh air shall be done under the direct supervision of qualified persons who shall test for gas and vapors before welding or cutting starts and continuously during such an operation. No cutting or welding shall be permitted in atmospheres where any concentration of gas or vapor reaches 20 percent of the lower explosive limit or more while a probe hole is being drilled or when the tunnel face or material from a mine is being excavated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7979.

In tunnels or underground mines classified extrahazardous, sufficient air shall be supplied to maintain an atmosphere of all of the following conditions:

(a) Not less than 19 percent oxygen.

(b) Not more than 0.5 percent carbon dioxide.

(c) Not more than 5 parts per million nitrogen dioxide.

(d) No petroleum vapors or other toxic gases in concentrations exceeding the threshold limit values established annually by the American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7980.

All electrical equipment and machines, including diesel engines, used in tunnels or underground mines classified extrahazardous shall be permissible equipment. The division may, however, permit the use of nonpermissive equipment in a tunnel or underground mine in areas where it finds there is no longer danger from gas or other hazards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7981.

An escape chamber or alternate escape route shall be maintained within 5,000 feet of the tunnel face or areas being used to excavate material in an underground mine classified as gassy or extrahazardous. Workers shall be provided with emergency rescue equipment and trained in its use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7982.

Records of air flow and air sample tests to assure compliance with required standards shall be maintained by the employer at the site of any tunnel or underground mine classified extrahazardous. Such records shall be made available to any division representative upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7983.

The main fan line used for ventilation in any tunnel or underground mine classified extrahazardous shall contain a cutoff switch capable of halting all machinery underground automatically should the fan fail or its performance fall below minimum power needed to maintain a safe atmosphere.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7984.

In any tunnel or underground mine classified extrahazardous a device or devices which automatically and continuously test the atmosphere for gases or vapors shall be maintained. Such device or devices shall be placed as near the face or area of operation as practical, but never more than 50 feet from such point. The division shall determine if additional monitors are necessary and where they should be located. This requirement shall apply only to tunnels or underground mines where excavation of material is by mechanical means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7985.

All such testing device or devices shall be U.S. Bureau of Mines approved or acceptable to other authorities recognized by the division and shall automatically sound an alarm and activate flashing red signals visible to employees underground whenever the concentration of gases or vapors reaches or exceeds permissible levels. Permissible levels may be established lower than the limits set in division rules, regulations, or general orders whenever a division inspector considers such action necessary to make the operation safe for employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Licensing and Penalties [7990. - 8004.]

7990.

In any tunnel or mine under jurisdiction of the division, the use of explosives shall be limited to persons licensed by the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7991.

(a) To obtain a license under Section 7990, and to renew that license, a person shall pass an oral and written examination given by the division. The division shall offer the examination in Spanish, or any other language, when requested by the applicant. The division shall administer an examination orally when requested by an applicant who cannot write. Licenses shall be renewable every five years.

(b) The division shall set a nonrefundable fee for processing applications for licenses required by Section 7990 and a fee for administering examinations under this section. In fixing the amount of these fees, the division may include direct costs and a reasonable percentage attributable to
 the indirect costs of the division for administering this chapter. Those fees shall be deposited into the Occupational Safety and Health Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 226.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7992.

The board shall determine qualifications for persons seeking an “explosive blaster’s license” and rules and regulations for use of explosives in tunnels or mines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7993.

Any person holding an “explosive blaster’s license” who is convicted of violating any safety order involving the use or handling of explosives shall have his license suspended for not less than 30 days upon hearing by the division, in addition to any other penalties he may be assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7994.

Any person holding an “explosive blaster’s license” who is convicted of violating safety orders involving use or handling of explosives in which the violation is judged to be responsible for an accident involving serious injury or death shall have his or her license revoked for at least one year, in addition to any other penalties he or she may be assessed. Any person who has had his or her “explosive blaster’s license” revoked may apply for a new license after the minimum period of revocation expires. He or she shall be required to pass all examinations before a new license is granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 495.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7995.

Any person who has had his “explosive blaster’s license” revoked who is subsequently convicted of violations of a safety order involving the use or handling of explosives shall have his license permanently revoked in addition to other penalties he may be assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7996.

All safety equipment required to provide safe employment in tunnels or underground mines shall be U.S. Bureau of Mines approved, or acceptable to other authorities recognized by the division, and acceptable by the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7997.

The board shall review and update general orders for tunnels and mines at least every two years. Representatives of the unit inspecting tunnels and mines shall be consulted during each review and shall be permitted to submit suggested changes to the general orders at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7998.

The division shall also develop tests, available in English, Spanish, or other languages where a sufficient portion of employees exists to show need, to qualify gas testers and safety representatives in tunnels and mines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

7999.

No person shall be qualified to operate as a gas tester, or serve as a safety representative in a tunnel or underground mine unless he holds a certificate issued by the division. No certificate may be issued or renewed unless the applicant or licensee, as the case may be, has passed an examination given by the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

8000.

Requirements established by the board shall preempt local government rules, regulations, and laws requiring certification or licensing as gas testers or safety representatives. However, local governments may contract with the division for testing applicants and issuing certifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

8001.

The division shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs of the division to administer the examination and certification of gas testers and safety representatives for tunnels and mines. Renewals shall be made every five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 227.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.

All fees from applications shall be nonrefundable. Those fees shall be deposited into the Occupational Safety and Health Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 228.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8003.

Violation of regulations, rules, orders, or special orders adopted by the board or division as a condition of certification shall be punishable by suspension or revocation of certification, unless such violation is responsible for death or injury to employees, in which case it shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

8004.

The provisions of this part shall not apply to the normal operation, maintenance, or repair of any completed tunnels owned or operated by a utility as defined in Section 229 of the Public Utilities Code. However, it shall apply to the initial construction or substantial modification of such a tunnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. USE OF CARCINOGENS [9000. - 9061.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [9000. - 9009.]

9000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Occupational Carcinogens Control Act of 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

The purpose of this part is to clarify and strengthen the provisions of state law applicable to the use of carcinogens in California. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for effective implementation of the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

The following definitions shall govern the construction of this part. Additionally, except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) shall also be applicable to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

“Affected employee” means an employee who, as part of his or her employment, is involved in the use of a carcinogen, or an employee with respect to whom there is a substantial probability that he or she will become so involved as the result of his or her employer’s use of a carcinogen.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9004.

“Carcinogen” means and includes the following recognized cancer-causing substances for which standards have been adopted pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9020):

(a) Any of the following substances and any compound, mixture, or product containing these substances:

(1) 2-acetylaminofluorene.

(2) 4-aminodiphenyl.

(3) Benzidine and its salts.

(4) Bis(chloromethyl) ether.

(5) 3,3´-dichlorobenzidine and its salts.

(6) 4-dimethylaminoazobenzene.

(7) Beta-naphthylamine.

(8) 4-nitrodiphenyl.

(9) N-nitrosodimethylamine.

(10) Beta-propriolactone.

(11) Methyl chloromethyl ether.

(12) Alpha-naphthylamine.

(13) 4,4´-methylene-(bis)2-chloroaniline.

(14) Ethyleneimine.

(b) Asbestos, including chrysotile, amosite, crocidolite, tremolite, anthophyllite, and actinolite.

(c) Vinyl chloride.

(d) Any other substance for which standards are adopted and in effect due to cancer-causing properties and any compound, mixture, or product containing such a substance, except as specifically exempted from the standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9005.

“Division” means the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9006.

“Employer” means any of the following:

(a) The state and every state agency.

(b) Each county, city, district, and all public and quasi-public corporations and public agencies therein.

(c) Every person, including any public service corporation, which has any natural person in service.

(d) The legal representative of any deceased employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9007.

“Standards” means standards and orders adopted by the standards board pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9008.

“Standards board” means the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9009.

“Use” means any use of a carcinogen by an employer, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Manufacture of a carcinogen, industrial uses thereof, or formation of a carcinogen as a result of a chemical reaction.

(b) Sale or other transfer of a carcinogen.

(c) Storage or disposal of a carcinogen.

(d) Utilization of a carcinogen for research.

(e) Transport of a carcinogen. The State Department of Health Services and the division shall have concurrent jurisdiction with any federal agency to protect affected employees of interstate carriers, including rail carriers, while in this state, as provided in this part or as authorized by other provisions of state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, by Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Exemptions [9015. - 9015.]

9015.

Except where in conflict with Section 142.3, or other applicable provisions of law, the standards board may exempt from the provisions of this part and its standards uses of carcinogens which it determines have been shown by a preponderance of the evidence to present no substantial threat to employee health and which may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(a) Use of carcinogens specified in subdivision (a) of Section 9004 in operations involving the destructive distillation of carbonaceous materials, such as occurs in coke ovens.

(b) Use of asbestos, except where there is a material risk of substantial and repeated exposure of employees to this carcinogen.

Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the standards board shall adopt regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Standards and Administration [9020. - 9022.]

9020.

(a) Pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1, the standards board shall adopt standards for carcinogens at least as restrictive as the federal requirements for use of carcinogens promulgated under Section 6 of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (P.L. 91-596), as these federal requirements may be revised from time to time. Within six months after the effective date of any change in the federal requirements, the standards board shall amend its standards as necessary to comply with this subdivision.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state shall exercise strong leadership in preventing employees, employers, and other persons from being exposed to carcinogens. In this connection, it is the further intent of the Legislature that the standards board adopt standards for substances as to which there exists a preponderance of evidence of carcinogenicity, but for which the federal government has not yet promulgated requirements specified in subdivision (a). The division shall determine the necessity for the standards and shall develop and present the proposed standards to the standards board pursuant to Section 147.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.

All standards relating to the use of carcinogens which are in effect on January 1, 1986, including standards set forth in Sections 5208, 5209, and 5210 of Title 8 of the California Administrative Code, shall remain in effect until amended or repealed by the standards board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.5.

(a) Not later than January 1, 1987, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall propose a regulation concerning asbestos-related work, as defined in Section 6501.8, to the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board for review and adoption so as to protect most effectively the health and safety of employees. The regulation shall also include, but not be limited to, specific work practices and specific requirements for certification of all employees engaged in asbestos-related work.

(b) (1) Not later than July 1, 1991, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall propose regulations for the certification of asbestos consultants and site surveillance technicians to the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board for consideration and action. By January 1, 1992, the board shall adopt regulations regarding certification. The regulations shall address and encompass procedures to determine the requirements for the certification provided for by Article 11 (commencing with Section 7180) of Chapter 9 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code. The division shall prepare and administer an examination to determine qualifications for certification pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7184 and subdivision (c) of Section 7185 of the Business and Professions Code. The examination shall be administered on a periodic, regularly scheduled basis.

(2) The division may, in lieu of preparing and administering its own certification examination, approve one or more public or private institutions which offer programs in asbestos abatement training to prepare and administer the examination described in subdivision (b) of Section 7184 and subdivision (c) of Section 7185 of the Business and Professions Code. However, the division shall not approve any institution, organization, individual, or other entity for administering a certification examination if that institution, organization, individual or other entity engages, for compensation, in any aspect of asbestos abatement work. For purposes of developing or approving a certification examination pursuant to this section, the division shall consult with an advisory committee of individuals who have academic and professional experience in asbestos abatement work, including a certified industrial hygienist, representatives of asbestos abatement workers, and asbestos abatement contractors.

(c) This section does not exempt any employer from complying with the Hazardous Substances Information and Training Act (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 6360) of Part 1 of Division 5 of this code) and regulations adopted thereunder, nor does it exempt any employer from complying with Section 5208 of Title 8 of the California Administrative Code. For products not requiring contractor certification pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7058.5 of the Business and Professions Code, training and certification of employees shall be done by the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.6.

(a) The division shall charge a fee to each asbestos consultant and site surveillance technician who applies for certification pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9021.5 and Article 11 (commencing with Section 7180) of Chapter 9 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code. The fee shall be sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs to the division for administering the certification process, including preparation and administration of the examination. The fees collected shall be deposited in the Occupational Safety and Health Fund. Establishment of any fee pursuant to this section shall be accomplished through the regulatory process required by subdivision (b) of Section 9021.5.

(b) On the effective date of the measure adding this subdivision, any moneys in the Asbestos Training and Consultant Certification Fund and any assets, liabilities, revenues, expenditures, and encumbrances of that fund shall be transferred to the Occupational Safety and Health Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 229.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.8.

All asbestos consultant and site surveillance technician certifications shall be renewed annually. The division shall require asbestos consultants and site surveillance technicians to complete the annual refresher courses as required under the Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act (Subchapter II (commencing with Section 2641) of Chapter 53 of Title 15 of the United States Code) or the equivalent, as determined by the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.9.

(a) The division shall establish an advisory committee to develop and recommend by September 30, 1994, for action by the standards board in accordance with Section 142.3, specific requirements for hands-on, task-specific training programs for all craft employees who may be exposed to asbestos-containing construction materials and all employees and supervisors involved in operations pertaining to asbestos cement pipe, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 6501.8. The training programs shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) The physical characteristics and health hazards of asbestos.

(2) The types of asbestos cement pipe or asbestos-containing construction materials an employee may encounter in his or her specific work assignments.

(3) Safe practices and procedures for minimizing asbestos exposures from operations involving asbestos cement pipe or asbestos-containing construction materials.

(4) A review of general industry and construction safety orders relating to asbestos exposure.

(5) Hands-on instruction using pipe or other construction materials and the tools and equipment employees will use in the workplace.

(b) The division shall approve training entities to conduct task-specific training programs that include the requirements prescribed by the standards board pursuant to this section for employees and
 supervisors involved in operations pertaining to asbestos cement pipe or asbestos-containing construction materials.

(c) The division shall charge a fee to each asbestos training entity approved by the division pursuant to subdivision (b). The fee shall be sufficient to cover the division’s direct and indirect costs for administering the approval process provided for in subdivision (b). The fees collected shall be deposited in the Occupational Safety and Health Fund. Establishment of any fee pursuant to this section shall be accomplished through the regulatory process required by subdivision (b) of Section 9021.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 231.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9022.

The division shall have primary responsibility for enforcement of standards relating to carcinogens. However, the State Department of Health Services shall assist the division in the enforcement of the standards, in the manner prescribed by this chapter, and as shall be further defined by a written agreement between the State Department of Health Services and the department, pursuant to Section 144.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Reporting [9030. - 9032.]

9030.

The standards board shall adopt one or more standards requiring each employer which uses any carcinogen, including asbestos and vinyl chloride, to submit a written report regarding the use or any incident which results in the release of a potentially hazardous amount of a carcinogen into any area where employees may be exposed. The reporting requirements set forth in Sections 5209 and 5210 of Title 8 of the California Administrative Code on January 1, 1986, shall remain in effect until amended or repealed by the standards board, and any subsequent reporting requirements shall provide for reports which are at least as detailed as those required on that date. For asbestos and vinyl chloride, the standards board shall adopt a standard which requires each employer who uses vinyl chloride or asbestos to report in a manner similar to the reporting required pursuant to Section 5209 of Title 8 of the California Administrative Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9031.

The division shall transmit a copy of each report specified in Section 9030 to any bargaining representatives, and other representatives known to the division, of affected employees of the reporting employer. A copy of each report shall be posted by the employer in the location or locations where the carcinogen is used, which shall be conspicuous to affected employees, as shall be provided in the standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9032.
